Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.40.060

Custodial interference in the first degree.

(1) A relative of a child under the age of eighteen or of an incompetent person is guilty of custodial interference in the first degree if, with the intent to deny access to the child or incompetent person by a parent, guardian, institution, agency, or other person having a lawful right to physical custody of such person, the relative takes, entices, retains, detains, or conceals the child or incompetent person from a parent, guardian, institution, agency, or other person having a lawful right to physical custody of such person and:

(a) Intends to hold the child or incompetent person permanently or for a protracted period; or

(b) Exposes the child or incompetent person to a substantial risk of illness or physical injury; or

(c) Causes the child or incompetent person to be removed from the state of usual residence; or

(d) Retains, detains, or conceals the child or incompetent person in another state after expiration of any authorized visitation period with intent to intimidate or harass a parent, guardian, institution, agency, or other person having lawful right to physical custody or to prevent a parent, guardian, institution, agency, or other person with lawful right to physical custody from regaining custody.

(2) A parent of a child is guilty of custodial interference in the first degree if the parent takes, entices, retains, detains, or conceals the child, with the intent to deny access, from the other parent having the lawful right to time with the child pursuant to a court order making residential provisions for the child, and:

(a) Intends to hold the child permanently or for a protracted period; or

(b) Exposes the child to a substantial risk of illness or physical injury; or

(c) Causes the child to be removed from the state of usual residence.

(3) A parent or other person acting under the directions of the parent is guilty of custodial interference in the first degree if the parent or other person intentionally takes, entices, retains, or conceals a child, under the age of eighteen years and for whom no lawful custody order or order making residential provisions for the child has been entered by a court of competent jurisdiction, from the other parent with intent to deprive the other parent from access to the child permanently or for a protracted period.

(4) Custodial interference in the first degree is a class C felony.

[ 2015 c 38 s 2; 1998 c 55 s 1; 1994 c 162 s 1; 1984 c 95 s 1.]

NOTES:

Intent—2015 c 38: "It is the intent of the legislature to address the Washington supreme court's decision in State v. Veliz, 176 Wn.2d 849 (2013). The court held that a parent cannot be charged with custodial interference under RCW 9A.40.060(2) if a parent withholds the other parent from having access to the child in violation of residential provisions of a domestic violence protection order. The legislature intends that the provisions of RCW 9A.40.060(2) and 9A.40.070(2) be applicable in cases in which a court has entered any order making residential provisions for a child including, but not limited to, domestic violence protection orders that include such residential provisions." [ 2015 c 38 s 1.]

Severability—1984 c 95: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1984 c 95 s 8.]